Idaho, session 2025, H0287.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 69, Title 39, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 69
ELECTRONIC MONITORING DEVICES IN LONG-TERM CARE FACILITIES
39-6901. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Electronic Monitoring Devices in Long-Term Care Facilities Act."
39-6902. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Electronic monitoring device" means a surveillance instrument
with a camera or an audio recording device, or a combination thereof, that
is installed in a resident's room and broadcasts or records activities or
sounds occurring in the room.
(2) "Health care agent" means a person named in an advance care planning
document to make medical decisions for another person as described in chap-
ter 45, title 39, Idaho Code.
(3) "Intimate body areas" means genitals, buttocks, the groin area, in-
ner thighs, or breasts.
(4) "Long-term care facility" or "facility" means both a nursing facil-
ity as defined in section 39-1301, Idaho Code, and a residential care or as-
sisted living facility as defined in section 39-3302, Idaho Code.
(5) "Resident" means an individual who resides in a long-term care fa-
cility.
(6) "Sensitive body areas" means parts of the human body that are con-
sidered private and that, due to cultural, ethical, or legal considerations,
require special protections in terms of privacy and dignity.
39-6903. AUTHORIZATION OF ELECTRONIC MONITORING DEVICES. (1) A resi-
dent or a resident's guardian or health care agent may authorize the instal-
lation and use of an electronic monitoring device in the resident's room in a
facility. The installation and use of an electronic monitoring device shall
be permitted by the facility if:


(a) Any forms prescribed by the facility pursuant to section 39-6904,
Idaho Code, are completed and submitted by the resident or the resi-
dent's guardian or the health care agent;
(b) The cost of the electronic monitoring device and the cost of in-
stalling, maintaining, and removing the electronic monitoring device,
other than the cost of electricity, is paid for by the resident or the
resident's guardian or health care agent; and
(c) The resident's room is not shared with another resident of the fa-
cility.
(2) If the use of an electronic monitoring device is permitted by a fa-
cility and authorized by a resident, such device shall be installed in a lo-
cation that meets the facility's standards and allows facility staff to as-
sist the resident while maintaining the privacy of the resident's sensitive
and intimate body areas. While an electronic monitoring device is active,
the facility shall make every effort to ensure that the resident's sensitive
and intimate body areas are properly covered to maintain the resident's dig-
nity and privacy.
(3) A resident who has authorized the installation and use of an elec-
tronic monitoring device may withdraw such authorization at any time.
(4) If a resident wishing to conduct authorized electronic monitoring
of the resident's room shares such room with another resident, the resident
or the resident's guardian or health care agent wishing to conduct autho-
rized electronic monitoring may request transfer to a private room. The res-
ident requesting to transfer rooms shall be responsible for any additional
costs associated with the transfer to a private room.
39-6904. ACTIONS BY A FACILITY. (1) A facility may prescribe a form for
use by a resident or the resident's guardian or health care agent seeking to
authorize the installation and use of an electronic monitoring device in the
resident's room. If a facility prescribes such a form, it shall include at a
minimum:
(a) An explanation of the provisions of this chapter;
(b) An acknowledgement that the resident or the resident's guardian or
health care agent has consented to the installation and use of the de-
vice in the resident's room;
(c) A section for providing the facility with information regarding the
type, function, and use of the device to be installed and used; and
(d) A section stating that the facility is released from liability in
any civil or criminal action or administrative proceeding for a viola-
tion of the resident's right to privacy in connection with using the de-
vice.
(2) A facility may post a notice in a conspicuous place at the entrance
to a resident's room if it has an electronic monitoring device stating that
an electronic monitoring device is in use in that room.
(3) No person or resident shall be denied admission to or discharged
from a facility or otherwise discriminated or retaliated against because of
the decision to authorize the installation and use of an electronic monitor-
ing device in a resident's room in the facility.


39-6905. PERSONS AUTHORIZED TO MODIFY DEVICE OR RECORDINGS. (1) No
person other than the resident or the resident's guardian or health care
agent who authorized the installation and use of an electronic monitoring
device in the resident's room shall intentionally obstruct, tamper with, or
destroy the device or a recording made by the device.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, no
person other than the following shall intentionally view or listen to the
images displayed or sounds recorded by an electronic monitoring device in-
stalled in a resident's room:
(a) The resident;
(b) The resident's guardian or health care agent; or
(c) Law enforcement personnel.
(3) A resident or the resident's guardian or health care agent may au-
thorize a person to view or listen to the images displayed or sounds recorded
by an electronic monitoring device installed in a resident's room.
(4) Upon receiving written consent of the resident or the resident's
guardian or health care agent, the family members of a resident may allow
the facility or members of the community to view or listen to the images dis-
played or sounds recorded by an electronic monitoring device.
39-6906. RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. The department of health and welfare
may promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval, necessary to admin-
ister the provisions of this chapter.
39-6907. PENALTIES. (1) A facility that violates the provisions of
section 39-6904(3), Idaho Code, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for a first offense. For each subsequent
offense, the violator shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five
hundred dollars ($500).
(2) A person who violates the provisions of section 39-6905, Idaho
Code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not to
exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail
for a term not to exceed six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprison-
ment.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.